Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4020
Final decision; notification; appeal.

Within a reasonable time after the hearing pursuant to section 77-4019, the Tax Commissioner shall make a final decision or final determination and notify the licensee or certified manufacturer by mail of such decision or determination. If any tax or additional tax becomes due, such notice shall be accompanied by a demand for payment of any tax due. A licensee or certified manufacturer may appeal the decision of the Tax Commissioner, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 162;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 51;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 35.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.